Illinois, session 104th, SB2647.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5adding Section 5-65 as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 5/5-65 new)7    Sec. 5-65. Pediatric primary care; rates. Beginning 8January 1, 2026, providers offering pediatric primary care 9shall be reimbursed at a rate that is no lower than 100% of the 10Medicare program's rates for preventative and screening 11services.